da: Kompostråmateriale: Biokulberiget; Madspild; Grønt- og haveaffald; Gødning; Blandet; Svampesubstrat; Tang; Træ; Ormekompost; Andet
sl-SI: Material vira komposta: Obogateno z bioogljem; Odpadki hrane; Zeleni in vrtni odpadki; Gnoj; Mešan; Substrat za gobe; Morske alge; Lesen; Črvasti ulitki; Druga
es: Material de origen del compost: Biocarbón enriquecido; Desperdicio de alimentos; Residuos verdes y de jardín; Estiércol; Mezcla; Sustrato para hongos; Alga; Madera; Compost de lombriz; Otros
sk-SK: Zdrojový materiál kompostu: Obohatené biouhlím; Potravinový odpad; Zelený a záhradný odpad; Hnoj; Zmiešaný; Substrát pre huby; Morské riasy; Drevný; Trus dážďoviek; Iné
ko: 퇴비 원재료: 바이오차 강화; 음식물 쓰레기; 정원 폐기물/녹색 쓰레기; 비료; 혼합; 버섯 배지; 해조류; 목재; 지렁이 분변토; 기타
zh-TW: 堆肥來源材質: 富含生物炭; 廚餘; 綠色垃圾和庭院垃圾; 有機肥; 混合; 菇類栽培介質; 海藻; 木材; 蚯蚓土; 其他
fr: Matière d’origine du compost: Enrichi en biochar; Déchets alimentaires; Déchets verts et de jardin; Fumier; Mixte; Substrat de champignons; Algue; Bois; Turricules; Autre
de: Ausgangsmaterial für Kompost: Mit Biokohle angereichert; Lebensmittelabfälle; Grün- und Gartenabfälle; Dünger; Gemischt; Pilzsubstrat; Algen; Holz; Wurmkot; Sonstiges
it: Materiale di origine del compost: Biochar arricchito; Rifiuti alimentari; Verde e rifiuti da giardino; Letame; Misto; Substrato per funghi; Alghe marine; Legno; Lombricato; Altro
pt-BR: Material de origem do adubo: Enriquecido com biochar; Resíduos de alimentos; Resíduos verdes e de jardim; Esterco; Mix; Substrato de cogumelo; Alga; Madeira; Húmus de minhoca; Outro
lt-LT: Komposto šaltinio medžiaga: Praturtintas bioanglimi; Maisto atliekos; Žaliosios ir kiemo atliekos; Mėšlas; Maišytas; Grybų substratas; Jūros dumbliai; Mediena; Sliekų liejiniai; Kita
ru: Исходный материал для компоста: Обогащенный биоуголь; Пищевые отходы; Зеленые и садовые отходы; Навоз; Смешанный; Грибной субстрат; Морские водоросли; Дерево; Червячный компост; Другой
th: วัตถุดิบตั้งต้นในการทำปุ๋ยหมัก: ถ่านชีวภาพเสริมประสิทธิภาพ; เศษอาหาร; ขยะอินทรีย์จากพืชและสวน; ปุ๋ยคอก; แบบผสม; วัสดุเพาะเห็ด; สาหร่ายทะเล; ไม้; มูลไส้เดือน; อื่นๆ
el: Υλικό προέλευσης κομπόστ: Εμπλουτισμένη με βιοάνθρακα; Υπολείμματα τροφίμων; Πράσινα και αυλικά υπολείμματα; Κοπριά; Μικτό; Υπόστρωμα μανιταριών; Φύκια; Ξύλο; Χούμος γαιοσκωλήκων; Άλλο
hu: Komposzt forrásanyag: Biochar dúsítva; Élelmiszerhulladék; Zöld és kerti hulladék; Trágya; Vegyes; Gombaszubsztrátum; Alga; Fa; Féregtrágya; Egyéb
zh-CN: 堆肥源材料: 生物炭强化; 厨余垃圾; 绿化及庭院废弃物; 畜禽粪便; 混合; 蘑菇培养基; 海藻; 木材; 蚯蚓粪; 其他
en: Compost source material: Biochar enriched; Food waste; Green and yard waste; Manure; Mixed; Mushroom substrate; Seaweed; Wood; Worm castings; Other
vi: Nguyên liệu nguồn làm phân ủ: Làm giàu bằng than sinh học; Rác thải thực phẩm; Rác thải xanh và rác làm vườn; Phân chuồng; Hỗn hợp; Giá thể trồng nấm; Rong biển; Gỗ; Phân trùn quế; Khác
tr: Kompost kaynak malzemesi: Biyokömürle zenginleştirilmiş; Gıda atığı; Yeşil ve bahçe atıkları; Gübre; Karışık; Mantar substratı; Deniz yosunu; Odun; Solucan gübresi; Diğer
pl: Materiał źródła kompostu: Wzbogacony biowęgiel; Odpady spożywcze; Odpady zielone i ogrodowe; Obornik; Mieszany; Podłoże pieczarkowe; Wodorosty; Drewno; Wermikompost; Pozostałe
nb: Kompostkildemateriale: Biokullberiket; Matsvinn; grønt og hageavfall; Gjødsel; Blandet; Soppsubstrat; Tang; Trevirke; Ormstøpegods; Annet
cs: Zdrojový materiál kompostu: Biouhlem obohacený; Potravinový odpad; Zahradní odpad; Hnůj; Mix; Houbový substrát; Mořské řasy; Dřevo; Žížalí trus; Jiné
sv: Ursprungligt kompostmaterial: Biokolsberikad; Matsvinn; Grönt och trädgårdsavfall; Gödsel; Blandad; Svampsubstrat; Tång; Trä; Maskgjutningar; Övrigt
nl: Compost-bronmateriaal: Biochar verrijkt; Voedselafval; Groen- en tuinafval; Mest; Gemengd; Paddenstoelensubstraat; Zeewier; Hout; Wormenmest; Overig
ja: コンポストソース素材: バイオ炭強化; 食品廃棄物; 緑および庭の廃棄物; 肥料; ミックス; キノコ培地; 海藻; 木材; ミミズ堆肥; その他
bg-BG: Източник на материали за компост: Обогатено с биовъглища; Хранителни отпадъци; Зелени и градински отпадъци; Тор; Смесено; Субстрат за гъби; Морски водорасли; Дърво; Тор от червеи; Друго
ro-RO: Material sursă pentru compost: Compost activat cu biochar; Risipă alimentară; Deșeuri verzi și de grădină; Balegă; Amestecat; Substrat de ciuperci; Alge marine; Lemn; Gunoi de vierme; Altele
fi: Kompostin lähdemateriaali: Biohiilellä rikastettu; Ruokahävikki; Lehti- ja puutarhajäte; Lanta; Sekalainen; Sienikasvusto; Merilevä; Puu; Matokomposti; Muu
pt-PT: Material de origem do produto de compostagem: Enriquecido com biochar; Desperdício de alimentos; Resíduos verdes e de jardim; Estrume; Mistura; Substrato de cogumelo; Alga; Madeira; Húmus de minhoca; Outro
hr-HR: Izvorni materijal komposta: Obogaćeno biougljenom; Otpad od hrane; Zeleni i vrtni otpad; Gnoj; Miješani; Supstrat za gljive; Alge; Drvo; Vermikompost; Ostalo